Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3415
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Peer-to-Peer Vehicle Sharing Program Act shall be construed to limit the powers of an airport authority under Nebraska law.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 15.